lib/dict/pl_PL.aff
SFX H   ¶æ        dli¶my    a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³y¶my    a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dli¶cie   a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³y¶cie   a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dli       a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³y       a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³bym     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³abym    a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³by¶     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³aby¶    a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³by      a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³aby     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³oby     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³yby     a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby¶cie a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³yby¶cie a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby¶my  a¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        d³yby¶my  a¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³em     [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³am     [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³e¶     [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³a¶     [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³       [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³a      [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³o      [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edli¶my   [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³y¶my   [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edli¶cie  [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³y¶cie  [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edli      [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³y      [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³bym    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³abym   [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³by¶    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³aby¶   [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³by     [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³aby    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³oby    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edliby    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³yby    [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edliby¶cie [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³yby¶cie [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       edliby¶my [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ad³yby¶my [^z]±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³em     z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³am     z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³e¶     z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³a¶     z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³       z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³a      z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³o      z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdli¶my   z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³y¶my   z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdli¶cie  z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³y¶cie  z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdli      z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³y      z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³bym    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³abym   z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³by¶    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³aby¶   z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       ±d³by     z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³aby    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³oby    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdliby    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³yby    z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdliby¶cie z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³yby¶cie z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êdliby¶my z±¶æ
SFX H   ±¶æ       êd³yby¶my z±¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³em     [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³am     [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³e¶     [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³a¶     [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ód³       [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³a      [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³o      [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edli¶my   [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³y¶my   [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edli¶cie  [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³y¶cie  [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edli      [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³y      [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ód³bym    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³abym   [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ód³by¶    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³aby¶   [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ód³by     [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³aby    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³oby    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edliby    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³yby    [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edliby¶cie [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³yby¶cie [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       edliby¶my [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       od³yby¶my [^mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³em     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³am     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³e¶     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³a¶     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ós³       [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³a      [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³o      [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li¶my    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³y¶my   [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li¶cie   [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³y¶cie  [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li       [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³y      [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ós³bym    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³abym   [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ós³by¶    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³aby¶   [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ós³by     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³aby    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³oby    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby     [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³yby    [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby¶cie [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³yby¶cie [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby¶my  [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       os³yby¶my [mn]ie¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³em     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³am     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³e¶     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³a¶     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³       je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³a      je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³o      je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dli¶my    je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³y¶my   je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dli¶cie   je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³y¶cie  je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dli       je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³y      je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³bym    je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³abym   je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³by¶    je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³aby¶   je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³by     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³aby    je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³oby    je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby     je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³yby    je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby¶cie je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³yby¶cie je¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        dliby¶my  je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ad³yby¶my je¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³em     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³am     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³e¶     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³a¶     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ót³       le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³a      le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³o      le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li¶my    le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³y¶my   le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li¶cie   le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³y¶cie  le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶li       le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³y      le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ót³bym    le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³abym   le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ót³by¶    le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³aby¶   le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ót³by     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³aby    le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³oby    le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby     le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³yby    le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby¶cie le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³yby¶cie le¶æ
SFX H   ¶æ        ¶liby¶my  le¶æ
SFX H   e¶æ       ot³yby¶my le¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³em   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³am     [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³e¶   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³a¶     [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³     [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³a      [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³o      [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli¶my   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y¶my   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli¶cie  [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y¶cie  [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli      [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y      [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³bym  [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³abym   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³by¶  [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³aby¶   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szed³by   [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³aby    [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³oby    [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby    [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby    [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby¶cie [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby¶cie [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby¶my [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby¶my [^e]j¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³em   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³am     [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³e¶   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³a¶     [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³     [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³a      [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³o      [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szli¶my   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³y¶my   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szli¶cie  [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³y¶cie  [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szli      [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³y      [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³bym  [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³abym   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³by¶  [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³aby¶   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³by   [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³aby    [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³oby    [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szliby    [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³yby    [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szliby¶cie [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³yby¶cie [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szliby¶my [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      sz³yby¶my [^bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³em   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³e¶   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³     [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³am     [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³a¶     [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³a      [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³o      [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli¶my   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y¶my   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli¶cie  [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y¶cie  [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szli      [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³y      [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³bym  [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³by¶  [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ej¶æ      szed³by   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³abym   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³aby¶   [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³aby    [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³oby    [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby    [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby    [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby¶cie [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby¶cie [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       szliby¶my [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   j¶æ       sz³yby¶my [bdw]ej¶æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³em      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³am      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³e¶      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³a¶      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³        y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³a       y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³o       y¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶my     y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³y¶my    y¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶cie    y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³y¶cie   y¼æ
SFX H   æ         li        y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³y       y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³bym     y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³abym    y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³by¶     y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³aby¶    y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³by      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³aby     y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³oby     y¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby      y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³yby     y¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶cie  y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³yby¶cie y¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶my   y¼æ
SFX H   ¼æ        z³yby¶my  y¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³em     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³am     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³e¶     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³a¶     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³       [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³a      [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³o      [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶my     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³y¶my   [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶cie    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³y¶cie  [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         li        [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³y      [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³bym    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³abym   [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³by¶    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³aby¶   [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³by     [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³aby    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³oby    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby      [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³yby    [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶cie  [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³yby¶cie [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶my   [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       az³yby¶my [^i]e¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³em     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³am     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³e¶     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³a¶     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       óz³       ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³a      ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³o      ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶my     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³y¶my   ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         li¶cie    ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³y¶cie  ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         li        ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³y      ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       óz³bym    ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³abym   ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       óz³by¶    ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³aby¶   ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       óz³by     ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³aby    ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³oby    ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby      ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³yby    ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶cie  ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³yby¶cie ie¼æ
SFX H   æ         liby¶my   ie¼æ
SFX H   e¼æ       oz³yby¶my ie¼æ
SFX H   eæ        a³em      [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³am      [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³e¶      [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³a¶      [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³        [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³a       [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³o       [^rz]eæ
SFX H   æ         li¶my     [^rz]eæ
SFX H   eæ        a³y¶my    [^rz]eæ
